Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1001.02
Assistance; action for reimbursement; statute of limitations; when commences to run.

No statute of limitations shall apply to any claim or cause of action, belonging to the county or state on account of the payment of assistance to the aged, blind or disabled while the recipient, former recipient, spouse, or dependent children of such recipient survive.

Laws 1935, Spec. Sess., c. 28, § 13, p. 172;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 68-269;

R.S.1943, § 68-216;

Laws 1965, c. 395, § 22, p. 1272;

R.S.1943, (1990), § 68-216.

Statute of limitations on claim for reimbursement does not begin to run while recipient is alive. Boone County Old Age Assistance Board v. Myhre, 149 Neb. 669, 32 N.W.2d 262 (1948).